Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB461.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.6312 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section[Notwithstanding any state law
to the contrary], the cabinet or a managed care organization contracted by the
cabinet to provide Medicaid services pursuant to this chapter shall not institute
copayments, cost sharing, or similar charges to be paid by any medical assistance
recipients, their spouses, or parents, for any assistance provided pursuant to this
chapter, federal law, or any federal Medicaid waiver.
(2) (a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the cabinet shall exercise the
state's option under 42 C.F.R. sec. 447.54 to impose cost sharing for
nonemergency services provided in a hospital emergency department. Cost
sharing requirements imposed under this section shall:
1. To the fullest extent permitted under federal law, apply to all Medicaid
beneficiaries;
2. Exempt only those beneficiaries as the state may be required to exempt
in order to comply with federal law; and
3. Include cost sharing amounts for individuals with family income;
a. Equal to or less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the
federal poverty level that are equal to the maximum allowable
cost sharing under 42 C.F.R. sec. 447.54(b); and
b. Greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal
poverty level at least equal to those imposed under subdivision a.
of this subparagraph.
(b) Unless otherwise required by federal law, cost sharing requirements
imposed under this section shall not be waived, excused, or otherwise
reduced or dismissed by the cabinet, the Department for Medicaid Services,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/10/2025 12:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1613
any managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the
delivery of Medicaid services, or any other third-party administrator
contracted by the cabinet or department to administer any part of the
Medicaid program.
Section 2. If the Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form
of authorization or approval from any federal agency is necessary prior to implementation
of Section 1 of this Act for any reason, including the loss of federal funds, the department
or cabinet shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request any necessary
state plan amendment, waiver, authorization, or approval, and may only delay full
implementation of those provisions for which a state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval was deemed necessary until the state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval is granted or approved.
Section 3. The Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services shall, in accordance with KRS 205.525, provide a copy of any state plan
amendment, waiver application, or other request for authorization or approval submitted
pursuant to Section 2 of this Act to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to
the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and shall provide an update on the status of any application
or request submitted pursuant to Section 2 of this Act at the request of the Legislative
Research Commission or any committee thereof.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/10/2025 12:50 PM Jacketed